Tennessee, session 114, SB1482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 568 of the Private Acts of 1939, as amended by Chapter 107 of
the Private Acts of 1981, Chapter 129 of the Private Acts of 2006, Chapter 66 of the Private
Acts of 2014, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting Section 11 in
Article XII and renumbering the remaining sections accordingly.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of Portland. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed
by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
SB1482
009234
- 1 -